Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 21
COMMERCIAL DRIVER SCHOOLS

Sec.

§ 49-2101. Duties of the state board of education

Rules. [Repealed.]

§ 49-2102. Schools — License required

Contents of application for license. [Repealed.]

§ 49-2103. Instructors — License required — Contents of application for license

Public school contracts. [Repealed.]

§ 49-2104. Expiration and renewal of licenses

Fees. [Repealed.]

§ 49-2105. Refusal, suspension or revocation of licenses. [Repealed.]

§ 49-2106. Exclusions — Free instruction

Colleges, universities and high schools. [Repealed.]